Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1013

Statement of termination.

(1) A dissolved limited cooperative association that has completed winding up may deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of termination that states:

(a) The name of the association;

(b) The date of filing of its initial articles of organization; and

(c) That the association is terminated.

(2) The filing of a statement of termination does not itself terminate the limited cooperative association.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1013.]